Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1006.
do enact as follows:AB1006,14Section 1. 45.01 (12) (jm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1006,2,3545.01 (12) (jm) A current or former member of the national guard who met the 1requirements for satisfactory completion of his or her initial term of obligated 2service and received an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable 3conditions.AB1006,24Section 2. 45.51 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1006,2,6545.51 (2) (a) 1. A veteran, other than a veteran described under s. 45.01 (12) 6(jm).AB1006,2,77